Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1343
Rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education in consultation with the coordinating council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the K-12 Education Cybersecurity Act.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 31.
July 18, 2026